test/src/morphology/N-vanas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - vanas: # -udda med stv men utan vokalv
    vanas+N+Sg+Nom: vanas
    vanas+N+Sg+Gen: vadnasa
    vanas+N+Sg+Acc: vadnasav
    vanas+N+Sg+Ill: vadnasij
    vanas+N+Sg+Ine: vadnasin
    vanas+N+Sg+Ela: vadnasist
    vanas+N+Sg+Com: vadnasijn
    vanas+N+Pl+Nom: vadnasa
    vanas+N+Pl+Gen: vadnasij
    vanas+N+Pl+Acc: vadnasijt
    vanas+N+Pl+Ill: vadnasijda
    vanas+N+Pl+Ine: vadnasijn
    vanas+N+Pl+Ela: vadnasijst
    vanas+N+Pl+Com: vadnasij
    vanas+N+Ess: vadnasin
    vanas+N+Abe: vadnasahtá
